Utah statutes.
10-3-507.   Minimum vote required.

(1)  The minimum number of yes votes required to pass any ordinance or resolution, or to take any action by the council, unless otherwise prescribed by law, is a majority of all voting members of the council, without considering any vacancy in the council.

(2) (a)  Any ordinance, resolution, or motion of the council having fewer favorable votes than required in this section is defeated and invalid.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a council meeting may be adjourned to a specific time by a majority vote of the council even though the majority vote is less than that required in this section.

(3)  A majority of the council members, regardless of number, may fill any vacancy in the council.

